src/fst/morphology/incoming/bla_phon2.regex
!test itapoo>wa -> itapoowa
!test it<á<opii>o7pa -> itáópaoo7pa
!test it<á<opii>wa -> itáópiiwa
!test áak<omáópii>o7pa -> áakomáópaoo7pa
!test áak<omáópii>yi>aawa -> áakomáópiiyaawa
!test ipiksi>o7pa -> ipiksao7pa
!test ipiksi>wa -> ipiksiwa
!test innisi7yi>wa innisi7yiwa
!test á<otsi>wa -> áótsimma
!test á<otsi>o7pa -> áótso7pa
!test áak<ipii>yini>áyi -> áaksipiimmináyi
!test yáak<ohpommatoo>m>wa>aistsi -> áakohpommatoomaistsi
!test ksikksinattsi>yi>aistsi -> ksikksinattsiyaistsi
!test á<yo7kaa>yi>aiksi -> áyo7kaayaiksi
!test á7pistotsi>m>yini>aistsi -> á7pistotsiminaistsi
!test kit<áak>ipii -> kitáaksipii
!test nit<okskoihtsi>ok>wa -> nitokskoihtsooka
!test ni<waawayáki>ok>wa -> nitaawayákiooka
!test it<opii>t -> istopiit
!
! Miscellaneous tests
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!
!test nit<ihpiyi -> nitsspiyi
!test sa<oht>yi -> saohtsi
!test nit<yo7kaa -> nitso7kaa
!test nit<áak<yo7kaa -> nitáakso7kaa
!test nit<áak>ooyi -> nitáaksoyi
!test nit<ooyi -> nitsoyi
!test ooyi -> iiyi
!test nit<yoohto>aa>wa -> nitsiiyoohtoaawa
!test nit<yáapi -> nitsáapi
!test w<iksísst>yi -> oksísstsi
!test n<iksísst>wa -> niksíssta
!test w<mo7tsís>oaawa>istsi -> o7tsoaawaistsi
!
!
!
! Reusable Regexes
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!
define Bx [ %> | %< ] ;
define phonemes [ p | t | k | m | n | s | w | y | h | 7 | a | i | o | á | í | ó ] ;
define vowels [ a | i | o | á | í | ó ] ;
define accentedVowels [ á | í | ó ] ;
define strongNasals [ n2 | m2 ] ;
define LongVowels [ [a a] | [i i] | [o o] ] ;
define consonants [ p | t | k | m | n | s | w | y ] ;
define obstruents [ p | t | k | m | n | s ] ;
define stops [ p | t | k | m | n ] ;
define plosives [ p | t | k ] ;
define glides [ w | y ] ;
define Cgem [ [m m] | [n n] | [s s] | [k k] | [t t] ] ;
! This is an orthophonological issue, but ts does not appear at the beginning of words
! so it usually is representing nits or kits. This rule fixes that right away.

! define tsRule [ [ n i t | k i t ] -> t || _ Bx ] ;

! Allomorphic Transformations (cf. Frantz 1991, pp. 78--83)
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Many of the transformations listed here are quite ad hoc and contain lots of
! tedious environments based on lexical conditions. Putting so much lexical
! information into the phonology is perhaps not elegant, but it works. In
! fact, to make this phonology better, more lexical detail should be included
! here.
!
! A. Initial Vowel Elision in Imperatives: ipii-t -> piit (Frantz 1991, pp. 78--79)
! Note that forms like ihpiyi-t are ihpiyit, hence the consonants regex below.
! Note that this elision might be more general; i.e., it might occur with
! nominalizations too.
! Note that the first FST in the composition below transforms i(i)t- to ist- in
! imperatives (cf. Frantz 1991, p. 96, fn. 120). Note also that the rather
! complex conditions on i-elision (i.e., the second compositum) are needed in
! order to allow for i(i)t- -> ist- to occur without it becoming st-.
define imperativeInitialVowelElision [
    [ [..] -> s || .#. (i) i _
        t Bx [ phonemes | Bx ]+ Bx t .#. ] .o.
    [ i -> 0 || .#. _
        [ consonants - s ] [ [ phonemes | Bx ] - s ]
        phonemes [ phonemes | Bx ]* Bx t .#. ] .o.
    [ o h -> 0 || .#. _
        consonants [ phonemes | Bx ]+ Bx t .#. ] ] ;

! B. Stop-stop Epenthesis: sik<kiááyo -> sikohkiááyo (Frantz 1991, pp. 78--79)
define stopStopEpenthesis [
    [..] -> [ i | o h ] || plosives Bx _ [ plosives | n á á m a y i ] ] ;

! C. Coda-fication: sik<ponoká -> siksinnoka (Frantz 1991, p. 79)
define codafication [
    p o n -> i n n || stops Bx _ o k á [ Bx | .#. ] .o.
    k i i p -> i p p || stops Bx _ ó [ Bx | .#. ] .o.
    k i p -> i p p || stops Bx _ i t a [ Bx | .#. ] ] ;

! D. Nasal Loss: omahk<natáyo>wa -> omahkatayowa (Frantz 1991, p. 80)
define nasalLoss [ [ m | n ] -> 0 || consonants Bx _ ] ;

! E. Word-initial nasals
! Some verbs that appear to start with vowels, actually begin with a nasal
! word-initially, or, more accurately, in imperative or nominalization
! constructions. There seems to be some quite ad hoc lexical/phonological
! alternations here that are just begging for a more unified explanataion.
! This type of data might be evidence that the third person past tense forms
! do actually involve prefixation because such an analysis would allow us to
! group together the imperatives and nominalization constructions as truly
! having the stem at the left edge. Note: there are several other verbs that
! begin with a nasal (m or n) when in word-initial position. I don't have
! time to write them all into a rule right now. Searching the OLD for ^[mn].*t!$
! as a regexp in the orthographic transcription and excluding results that
! match the regexp (^| )(máát|miin) in the orthographic transcription will
! get them.
define impNomSfx [ Bx [ t | n | h s i n ] [ Bx | .#. ] ] ;
define nasalInitialVerbs [
    [ y a (a) -> n a || .#. _ m a a [ h k i a a k i | k i o k o 7 s i ] impNomSfx ] .o.
    [ y -> n         || .#. _ á á p i i 7 p o y i impNomSfx ] .o.
    [ [..] (->) n    || .#. _ [ i n i h k i | i p a i t a p i i y i ] impNomSfx ] .o.
    [ [..] -> n      || .#. _ i i t s i 7 p o y i impNomSfx ] .o.
    [ [..] -> n i    || .#. _ i p [ ó í s o y a a w a n i | o w á ó o ] impNomSfx ] .o.
    [ i s -> n a a   || .#. _ t s i k a p ó ó y i n n i impNomSfx ] .o.
    [ i s -> n a a   || .#. _ t s i k a p o i s í n a i i impNomSfx ] .o.
    [ o -> m a       || .#. _ t o o m [ phonemes | Bx ]+ impNomSfx ] ] ;

! F. Word-initial nominal segments become o elsewhere (Frantz 1991, p. 80)
! Note: this is probably a more common phenomenon than is captured by this
! rule! I just don't have time to sort through all of the lexical items where
! this occurs.
define becomeO [
    [ i -> o   || plosives Bx _ m i t á á ] .o.
    [ m a -> o || plosives Bx _ [ m í í | n i s t s í ] ] .o.
    [ i s (->) o || Bx _ t t o á n ] ] ;

! G. Word-initial verbal o becomes a elsewhere (Frantz 1991, p. 80)
! Optionally happens with okstaki and okaa (and maybe others ...)
define becomeA [ o (->) a || .#. _ k [ a a | s t a k i ] impNomSfx ] ;

! I. Variable-length vowels (Frantz 1991, pp. 80--81)
! Certain long vowels in certain morphemes are actually variable in length.
! These vowels are only long in certain environments, are variably long
! in one specific environment and are short elsewhere. Writing rewrite rules
! to account for this would be too time-consuming for me right now. Therefore
! I am going to create a rule that optionally shortens these vowels.
! The complex context in the following rules is meant to capture the fact that
! the first vowels in the following morphemes are variably long: wa:nii `say' (vai)
! a: `DIR', wa:wahkaa `play' (vai), wa:wayáki `hit' (vta), wa:yáki `hit' (vta),
! wa:sai'ni `cry' (vai), wa:hkayi `go home' (vai), sa:ksi `exit' (vai),
! a:nist `manner' (adt), wa:wakaa `walk' (vai), a:ki `vai-producing suffix' (fin),
! and wa:mi `be' (vai).
! Here is the generalization. Variable-length vowels are always long if any of
! the following are true: i) they are in the first syllable of a word, ii) they
! are preceded by a semivowel in the same morpheme that is not deleted by
! semivowel loss, or iii) they are preceded by i underlyingly, i.e., even if the
! i is deleted by i-Loss or i-Absorption. Variable-length vowels are variably
! long or short when preceded by one of the person prefixes nit-, kit- or ot-. In
! all other environments, these vowels are short. Note that many of the vowels
! from the agreement paradigms are like this (cf. around p. 149 of the Grammar).
! However, these seem to be really just portmanteau morphemes built upon the
! direct suffixes a: and o: ...
! WARNING: I think there is a much wider application of this rule than is specified
! here; i.e., there are many more morphemes that begin with variable-length vowels.
! THIS NEEDS WORK!
define variableLengthVowels [
    [ a a (->) a || [ .#. | Bx ] w _ [ n i i | n i s t | n i s t o o |
                                        w a h k a a |
                                        w a y á k i |
                                        y á k i |
                                        s a i 7 n i |
                                        h k a y i | 
                                        w a k a a |
                                        m i ] [ .#. | Bx ] ,
                    Bx _ Bx ,
                    [ .#. | Bx ] s _ k s i [ .#. | Bx ],
                    [ .#. | Bx ] _ [ n i s t | k i ] [ .#. | Bx ] ] .o.
    [ o o (->) o || Bx _ Bx ] .o.
    [ o (->) o o || Bx _ k ( [ o o | i ] ) Bx ] ] ;
! J. Non-permanent consonants (Frantz 1991, p. 81--82, 9)
! These consonants disappear before vowels. Since the dictionary does not
! employ the capitalization convention for these consonants, I posit an optional
! elision rule for morpheme-final /n/ and /s/ before vowels and a regular
! elision rule for morpheme-final /m/ in áto'ahsim `sock', máíipssim `belt',
! and asóka'sim `dress'.
! Note: the optionality-based implementation will cause yini-áyi to become
! correctly yin-áyi but also incorrectly yi-áyi !
! Note: the rule that is faithful to the N/M/S phonemes of the grammar is given
! below:
! define nonPermanentConsonants [
!     [ [ N | M | S ] -> 0 || _ Bx vowels ] .o.
!     [ N -> n , M -> m , S -> s || _ [ 7 | .#. ] ] ] ;
define nonPermanentConsonants [
    [ [ n | s ] (->) 0 || _ Bx vowels ] .o.
    [ m -> 0 || [
        á t o 7 a h s i |
        m á í i p s s i |
        a s ó k a 7 s i ] _
        Bx vowels ] ] ;

! K. 3mm (Frantz 1991, p. 82)
! Certain intransitive verbs have mm suffixed when a consonant-initial 
! morpheme follows. These verbs have been identified and are listed in
! the lexical phonological rule given below. Note that ikaissi has -mm
! suffixed optionally.
define 3mm [
    [ [..] -> m m || [ .#. | Bx ] [
        i k o ' p o |
        i k s i s á í i k i |
        i k s i s t o ' s i |
        i m i |
        i n á á m m |
        i n n o 7 s i |
        i p a h k s i m i |
        p á p i s a |
        i p a p o |
        i p i i |
        i p o i n a o h k o y i |
        i p o n i n a |
        i s t t s í í k i n a k i |
        i t s i k s i n a |
        i t s a 7 t a |
        i 7 n á k s t s s i |
        i 7 t s o y i |
        k s i k k s i n a a |
        m a o h k s i n a a |
        m i 7 k s i n a a |
        n i i s i t o y i |
        n i 7 t ó k s k a a |
        o h k o y i |
        o h k s s s a a n i i n a a |
        ó k o h k o y i |
        o k a 7 p i h t s i m i |
        o k s i k i n a k i |
        o k s i n a |
        o m a h k s i |
        o t a i m i |
        o t s i |
        o 7 k s t s i k s i n a a t t s i |
        o 7 k s t s í k s i n a a |
        o 7 t s s o p o k i i y i |
        s a a h k s s t s s i |
        s a t s i k o h t a a |
        s a y í n a k o y i |
        s s k í i n a a |
        s s k a a |
        s s t o 7 s i |
        w a a k a y i |
        w a a p i s o y i i n a |
        y a a h s s i |
        y o o h s i n i i n a ] _ Bx [ w a | y i | y i n i ] [ Bx | .#. ] ] .o.
    [ [..] (->) m m || [ .#. | Bx ] i k a i s s i _ Bx [ w a | y i | y i n i ] [ Bx | .#. ] ] ] ;
        !y o o h s i n i i n a ] _ Bx [ consonants Bx t ] ] .o.
    ![ [..] (->) m m || [ .#. | Bx ] i k a i s s i _ Bx [ consonants Bx t ] ] ] ;
